el: Υλικό καμπάνας τρομπέτας: Μπρούντζος; Χρυσός ορείχαλκος; Αλπακάς; Ερυθρός ορείχαλκος; Ροζ ορείχαλκος; Ασήμι 925; Κίτρινος ορείχαλκος; Άλλο
cs: Materiál ozvučníku trumpety: Bronz; Zlatá mosaz; Alpaka; Červená mosaz; Růžová mosaz; Sterlingové stříbro; Žlutá mosaz; Ostatní
zh-CN: 小号喇叭口材料: 青铜; 金黄铜; 镍银; 红黄铜; 玫瑰黄铜; 标准纯银; 黄铜; 其他
ja: トランペットベル材質: ブロンズ; ゴールドブラス; ニッケルシルバー; レッドブラス; ローズブラス; スターリングシルバー; イエローブラス; その他
ko: 트럼펫 벨 소재: 청동; 골드 브라스; 니켈 실버; 레드 브라스; 로즈 브라스; 스털링 실버; 옐로 브라스; 기타
it: Materiale della campana della tromba: Bronzo; Ottone dorato; Alpacca; Ottone rosso; Ottone rosa; Argento sterling; Ottone giallo; Altro
fr: Matériau du pavillon de trompette: Bronze; Laiton doré; Maillechort; Laiton rouge; Laiton rose; Argent massif; Laiton jaune; Autre
bg-BG: Материал на раструба (камбаната) на тромпета: Бронз; Златен месинг; Алпака; Червен месинг; Розов месинг; Стерлингово сребро; Жълт месинг; Друг
pt-BR: Trompete material da campânula: Bronze; Latão dourado; Alpaca; Latão vermelho; Latão rosa; Prata de lei; Latão amarelo; Outro
pt-PT: Material da campânula do trompete: Bronze; Latão dourado; Alpaca; Latão vermelho; Latão rosa; Prata de lei; Latão amarelo; Outro
ro-RO: Materialul pavilionului trompetei: Bronz; Alamă aurie; Alpaca; Alamă roșie; Alamă roz; Argint veritabil; Alamă galbenă; Altele
lt-LT: Trimito varpo medžiaga: Bronza; Auksinis žalvaris; Naujasidabris; Raudonas žalvaris; Rožinis žalvaris; Sterlingo sidabras; Geltonas žalvaris; Kita
en: Trumpet bell material: Bronze; Gold brass; Nickel silver; Red brass; Rose brass; Sterling silver; Yellow brass; Other
vi: Vật liệu chuông kèn: Đồng; Đồng thau vàng kim; Niken bạc; Đồng thau đỏ; Đồng thau hồng; Bạc sterling; Đồng thau vàng; Khác
sk-SK: Materiál zvona trúbky: Bronz; Zlatá mosadz; Alpaka; Červená mosadz; Ružová mosadz; Šterlingové striebro; Žltá mosadz; Iný
tr: Trompet çanı malzemesi: Bronz; Altın pirinç; Nikel gümüş; Kırmızı pirinç; Pembe pirinç; Som gümüş; Sarı pirinç; Diğer
nl: Trompet beker materiaal: Brons; Goudmessing; Nieuwzilver; Roodmessing; Rozemessing; Sterlingzilver; Geelmessing; Anders
hr-HR: Materijal za trubu: Bronca; Zlatna mjed; Novo srebro; Crvena mjed; Ružičasta mjed; Sterling srebro; Žuta mjed; Ostalo
zh-TW: 小號揚音管材質: 青銅; 金黃銅; 白銅; 紅黃銅; 玫瑰黃銅; 標準純銀; 黃銅; 其他
es: Material para campanas de trompeta: Bronce; Latón dorado; Alpaca; Latón rojo; Latón rosa; Plata de ley; Latón amarillo; Otro
fi: Trumpetin kaikusuppilon materiaali: Pronssi; Kultamessinki; Uushopea; Punamessinki; Ruusumessinki; Sterling-hopea; Keltamessinki; Muu
th: วัสดุสำหรับทำปากแตร: สำริด; โกลด์บราส; นิกเกิลซิลเวอร์; เรดบราส; โรสบราส; เงินแท้; เยลโลบราส; อื่นๆ
hu: Trombita tölcsérének anyaga: Bronz; Aranyréz; Alpakka; Vörösréz; Rózsaréz; Sterling ezüst; Sárgaréz; Egyéb
sl-SI: Material odmevnika trobente: Bron; Zlata medenina; Novo srebro; Rdeča medenina; Rožnata medenina; Srebro sterling; Rumena medenina; Drugo
nb: Materiale til trompetklokke: Bronse; Gullmessing; Nysølv; Rødmessing; Rosemessing; Sterlingsølv; Gulmessing; Annet
ru: Материал раструба трубы: Бронза; Золотистая латунь; Нейзильбер; Красная латунь; Розовая латунь; Стерлинговое серебро; Желтая латунь; Другое
da: Materiale i trompetklokke: Bronze; Guldmessing; Nysølv; Rødmessing; Rosamessing; Sterlingsølv; Gulmessing; Andet
pl: Materiał czary trąbki: Brąz; Złoty mosiądz; Alpaka; Czerwony mosiądz; Różowy mosiądz; Srebro szterlingowe; Żółty mosiądz; Inne
de: Material des Trompetenschallstücks: Bronze; Goldmessing; Neusilber; Rotmessing; Rosémessing; Sterlingsilber; Gelbmessing; Sonstiges
sv: Material för trumpetklocka: Brons; Guldmässing; Nysilver; Rödmässing; Rosémässing; Sterlingsilver; Gulmässing; Annat